nb: Flyskrogsmateriale: Aluminium; Karbonfiber; Kompositt; Stoffdekket ramme; Glassfiber; Stål; Titan; Tre; Annet
cs: Materiál draku letadla: Hliník; Uhlíková vlákna; Kompozit; Kostra potažená tkaninou; Sklolaminát; Ocel; Titan; Dřevo; Ostatní
th: วัสดุโครงสร้างลำตัวอากาศยาน: อะลูมิเนียม; คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; คอมโพสิต; โครงหุ้มด้วยผ้า; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; เหล็กกล้า; ไทเทเนียม; ไม้; อื่นๆ
fr: Matériau de la structure de l’aéronef: Aluminium; Fibre de carbone; Composite; Structure entoilée; Fibre de verre; Acier; Titane; Bois; Autre
de: Flugzeugzellenmaterial: Aluminium; Kohlefaser; Verbundstoff; Bespannter Rahmen; Glasfaser; Stahl; Titan; Holz; Andere
pt-BR: Material da estrutura da aeronave: Alumínio; Fibra de carbono; Compósito; Estrutura revestida de tecido; Fibra de vidro; Aço; Titânio; Madeira; Outros
ru: Материал планера самолета: Алюминий; Углеродное волокно; Композит; Каркас с тканевой обшивкой; Стекловолокно; Сталь; Титан; Дерево; Другое
it: Materiale della struttura dell'aereo: Alluminio; Fibra di carbonio; Composito; Telaio rivestito in tessuto; Vetroresina; Acciaio; Titanio; Legno; Altro
vi: Vật liệu khung máy bay: Nhôm; Sợi carbon; Composite; Khung bọc vải; Sợi thủy tinh; Thép; Titan; Gỗ; Khác
sv: Flygplansskrovets material: Aluminium; Kolfiber; Komposit; Tygklädd ram; Glasfiber; Stål; Titan; Trä; Övrigt
ja: 航空機機体材料: アルミニウム; カーボンファイバー; 複合材; 羽布張りフレーム; グラスファイバー; スチール; チタン; 木材; その他
sl-SI: Material trupa letala: Aluminij; Ogljikova vlakna; Kompozit; Ogrodje, prevlečeno s tkanino; Steklena vlakna; Jeklo; Titan; Les; Drugo
ko: 항공기 기체 재료: 알루미늄; 탄소 섬유; 복합재; 직물 덮개 프레임; 유리 섬유; 강철; 티타늄; 목재; 기타
zh-CN: 飞机机身材料: 铝; 碳纤维; 复合材料; 布蒙皮骨架; 玻璃纤维; 钢; 钛; 木材; 其他
en: Aircraft airframe material: Aluminum; Carbon fiber; Composite; Fabric-covered frame; Fiberglass; Steel; Titanium; Wood; Other
tr: Uçak gövdesi malzemesi: Alüminyum; Karbon fiber; Kompozit; Kumaş kaplı gövde; Fiberglas; Çelik; Titanyum; Ahşap; Diğer
fi: Lentokoneen rungon materiaali: Alumiini; Hiilikuitu; Komposiitti; Kangaspäällysteinen runko; Lasikuitu; Teräs; Titaani; Puu; Muu
lt-LT: Orlaivio korpuso medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglies pluoštas; Kompozitas; Audiniu dengtas rėmas; Stiklo pluoštas; Plienas; Titanas; Mediena; Kita
pt-PT: Material da estrutura da aeronave: Alumínio; Fibra de carbono; Compósito; Estrutura revestida a tecido; Fibra de vidro; Aço; Titânio; Madeira; Outro
el: Υλικό σκελετού αεροσκάφους: Αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακονήματα; Σύνθετο υλικό; Σκελετός με επένδυση υφάσματος; Υαλονήματα; Χάλυβας; Τιτάνιο; Ξύλο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Materijal tijela letjelice: Aluminij; Ugljična vlakna; Kompozitni materijal; Okvir presvučen tkaninom; Stakloplastika; Čelik; Titanij; Drvo; Ostalo
es: Material de la estructura del avión: Aluminio; Fibra de carbono; Material compuesto; Estructura cubierta de tela; Fibra de vidrio; Acero; Titanio; Madera; Otro
hu: Repülőgép törzsének anyaga: Alumínium; Szénszál; Kompozit; Szövettel bevont váz; Üvegszál; Acél; Titán; Fa; Egyéb
zh-TW: 飛機機身材質: 鋁; 碳纖維; 複合材質; 布面覆蓋機架; 玻璃纖維; 鋼; 鈦; 木材; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на конструкцията на въздухоплавателното средство: Алуминий; Въглеродни влакна; Композитен материал; Рамка с текстилно покритие; Фибростъкло; Стомана; Титан; Дърво; Други
da: Luftfartøjets stelmateriale: Aluminium; Kulfiber; Komposit; Stofbeklædt ramme; Glasfiber; Stål; Titanium; Træ; Andet
sk-SK: Materiál draku lietadla: Hliník; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozit; Rám potiahnutý tkaninou; Sklolaminát; Oceľ; Titán; Drevo; Iné
nl: Materiaal vliegtuigframe: Aluminium; Koolstofvezel; Composiet; Met stof bekleed frame; Glasvezel; Staal; Titanium; Hout; Overig
pl: Materiał płatowca samolotu: Aluminium; Włókno węglowe; Kompozyt; Rama pokryta materiałem; Włókno szklane; Stal; Tytan; Drewno; Inne
ro-RO: Materialul fuselajului aeronavei: Aluminiu; Fibră de carbon; Compozit; Cadru acoperit cu material textil; Fibră de sticlă; Oțel; Titan; Lemn; Altele